South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4788.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 38-90-160(C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) The provisions of Sections 38-5-120(A)(5), 38-5-120(B), 38-5-120(D)(1), 38-5-120(D)(2), 38-9-225, 38-9-230, 38-21-10, 38-21-30, 38-21-60, 38-21-70, 38-21-80, 38-21-90, 38-21-95, 38-21-100, 38-21-110, 38-21-120, 38-21-130, 38-21-140, 38-21-150, 38-21-160, 38-21-170, 38-21-220, 38-21-225, 38-21-230, 38-21-250, 38-21-270, 38-21-280, 38-21-285, 38-21-290, 38-21-295, 38-21-310, 38-21-320, 38-21-330, 38-21-360, 38-55-75 and Chapters 44, 46, and 99, Title 38 and applicable regulations apply in full to a risk retention group and, if a conflict occurs between those code sections and chapters referenced in this subsection and this chapter (Chapter 90, Title 38), then the code sections and chapters referenced in this subsection control. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----